Arkansas statutes. Title 25 State Government
Chapter 8

Department of Finance and Administration

25-8-104. Director of Division of Budgets and Accounting.

25-9-101 — 25-9-107. [Repealed.]

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

25-10-101. [Repealed.]

The Department of Human Services is a cabinet-level department and shall consist of and be operated under an integrated service system consisting of the following programmatic divisions with responsibilities and programs assigned to them as determined by the Secretary of the Department of Human Services and those state entities transferred to the Department of Human Services pursuant to a cabinet-level department transfer under §25-43-902:

The Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human Services;

The Division of Medical Services;

The Division of Developmental Disabilities Services;

The Secretary's Office of the Department of Human Services shall consist of:

The Secretary of the Department of Human Services and his or her personal staff; and

Shared business services operating across the divisions, offices, sections, and units of the department, including without limitation business operations and administrative functions determined necessary by the secretary.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 38, § 12; 1985, No. 348, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-912, 5-912b; Acts 1989, No. 60, § 1; 1995, No. 164, § 1; 1997, No. 324, § 3; 2001, No. 1213, § 1; 2001, No. 1553, § 56; 2003, No. 1717, § 1; 2005, No. 1954, § 9; 2007, No. 384, § 9; 2007, No. 862, § 2; 2009, No. 549, § 1; 2011, No. 42, § 2; 2013, No. 980, § 18; 2013, No. 1107, § 46; 2015, No. 1203, § 1; 2017, No. 913, § 4; 2019, No. 910, § 5242.

25-10-103. [Repealed.]

The Board of Developmental Disabilities Services and the institutional and supportive facilities of the human development centers located at Alexander, Conway, Arkadelphia, Jonesboro, Booneville, and the Southeast Arkansas Human Development Center at Warren, and all improvements and additions to those institutional units made subsequent to February 4, 1971, shall be operated under the control of the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services within the Department of Human Services.

The Board of Developmental Disabilities Services shall name the administrative head or director of each of the respective institutions under the board's jurisdiction with the concurrence of the Secretary of the Department of Human Services.

Under a type 1 transfer of the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services, and the institutions under its management and control, to the department, the board shall have control of all budgeting, purchasing, and related management functions in accordance with the limitations and restrictions thereon provided in this act and by other laws applicable thereto.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 348, §§ 3, 8; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-902, 5-912d; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2913; 2019, No. 910, § 5243.

25-10-105. [Repealed.]

(1)The Secretary of the Department of Human Services, with the advice and consent of the Governor, shall employ the heads of the various divisions of the Department of Human Services.

The heads of the respective offices, sections, or units of the department and all other personnel of the department shall be employed by and serve at the pleasure of the secretary.

(1)However, the directors of the various institutions and programs under the jurisdiction and control of the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services within the Department of Human Services shall be named by the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services, with the concurrence of the secretary.

All personnel employed in the institutions under the management and control of the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services shall be named by the directors thereof, under the departmental rules related to personnel, and all personnel records of the institutions of the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services shall be in conformance with the general personnel policies promulgated by the secretary for other employees of the department.

Nothing in this act shall be construed to reduce any rights which an employee of the department or the various divisions, offices, sections, or units thereof shall have under any civil service or merit system.

History.

Acts 1971, No. 38, §§ 5, 12; 1985, No. 348, §§ 5, 12; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-912, 5-912i; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2914; 2019, No. 910, § 5244.

25-10-107. Reports by divisions.

All other divisions within the Department of Human Services shall provide the Secretary's Office of the Department of Human Services with all policies regarding personnel administration, procurement of commodities and services, accounting and budget control, licensure of facilities, program planning and evaluation, contractual agreements with consultants and providers of services, data processing systems management, federal grant management, and any other information which may be requested by the office.

(1)The other divisions shall report quarterly to the office concerning the areas of coordination and cooperation where the divisions have worked with other departmental divisions and concerning the plans for coordination and cooperation in the next quarter.

A copy of the report shall be sent to the Legislative Council upon request of the Legislative Council.

History.

Acts 1983, No. 307, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-912.4; Acts 1995, No. 164, § 2; 2017, No. 913, § 5; 2019, No. 910, § 5245.

25-10-108. Coordination of programs, procedures, etc., of department and institutional boards.

In addition to the functions and duties provided by law to be performed by the Secretary of the Department of Human Services, the secretary shall direct those divisions, offices, sections, or units of the Department of Human Services which he or she may designate to:

Serve in a liaison capacity for the Department of Human Services and the secretary thereof with the boards and the directors of the various institutional facilities of the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services within the Department of Human Services in efforts to coordinate services provided citizens of this state through those institutions with programs of the department for the benefit of neglected, dependent, and delinquent juveniles, individuals with mental illness, and individuals with intellectual disabilities or individuals with developmental disabilities of this state;

Cooperate with the administrators of the various institutions under the direction and control of the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services within the Department of Human Services in the administration of fiscal and budgetary policies applicable to all divisions and programs of the department as promulgated by the secretary thereof and as directed by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State;

Offer assistance to the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services within the Department of Human Services in developing biennial budgets and annual, quarterly, and monthly fiscal plans for the operation of those institutions and assist the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services in complying with the budget and fiscal policies promulgated by the Secretary of the Department of Human Services for the control and management of the funds made available to the department and its various offices, divisions, programs, and institutions. In connection therewith, the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services shall be furnished records of all accounts, expenditures, funds, and fund balances available to each institution for its operation and support;

Coordinate, with each institution and its administrator under the control and direction of the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services within the Department of Human Services, the purchasing policies and procedures of the department as promulgated by the secretary thereof to assure that all those institutions comply with the uniform purchasing practices and policies of the department and with the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 et seq., and the rules promulgated thereunder by the State Procurement Director.

However, each of the various institutions under the control of the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services within the Department of Human Services is authorized to have institutional purchasing officials who shall be authorized to make purchases in behalf of those institutions which are not within the exclusive jurisdiction of the State Procurement Director, but all such purchases shall be made in compliance with the uniform purchasing practices and policies promulgated by the secretary to be applicable to all divisions, offices, sections, or units of the department and shall be in conformance with the Arkansas Procurement Law, § 19-11-201 et seq., and rules promulgated by the State Procurement Director; and

Coordinate the policies promulgated by the secretary for the administration of personnel and personnel records within the various divisions, offices, sections, or units of the department with the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board, the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services within the Department of Human Services, and the administrators of each of those institutions to assure that all employee records and personnel records conform to the personnel policies and records promulgated by the secretary and to the personnel policies and practices laws of the State of Arkansas.

Nothing in this act shall prohibit or restrict the right of each of the institutional boards to employ, promote, discipline, or discharge any employee of any of those institutions so long as those actions are within the overall policies and procedures promulgated by the secretary governing employee practices or actions.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 deleted “and regulations” following “rules” in (4)(A); and substituted “rules” for “regulations” in (4)(B).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary” or “secretary” for “Director” or “director” throughout the section; and, in (3), substituted “the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services” for “those boards” and substituted “the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services” for “the boards”.

Meaning of “this act”. See note to §25-10-104.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 348, § 9; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-912f; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2915; 2019, No. 910, § 5246.

25-10-109. Institutional services generally — Development of admission policies, etc.

In addition to the functions and duties provided by law and this act to be performed by the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services within the Department of Human Services and the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board, it is the intent of this act that the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services shall cooperate with the Secretary of the Department of Human Services, the divisions, offices, sections, or units of the Department of Human Services created by this act, and the programs funded by and operated by the department by developing admission policies, criteria, and services which will assure appropriate access to institutional services to meet the residential service needs of the citizens of this state.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 348, § 10; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-912g; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5247.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services” for “those boards” and substituted “Secretary of the Department of Human Services” for “Director of the Department of Human Services”.

Meaning of “this act”. See note to §25-10-104.

25-10-110. Institutional services generally — Charges.

It is found and determined by the General Assembly that under existing law most institutions in the Department of Human Services engaged in providing services to members of the general public seek recovery of the costs of providing those services on the basis of the average per capita cost. It is further found and determined that these methods of charging costs result in significant revenue losses to the state and do not allow the recovery of the actual costs of providing the services.

The Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services, Arkansas Rehabilitation Services, the Division of Youth Services, and the Division of Developmental Disabilities Services are permitted to charge for institutional services provided to members of the public on an actual cost basis rather than on a per capita or other basis.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Rehabilitation Services, referred to in this section, is no longer a division of the Department of Human Services. See §§25-30-106 and25-30-201 et seq.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (b), substituted “Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human Services” for “Division of Behavioral Health Services” and inserted “of the Department of Human Services” following “Division of Youth Services”.

Although it is the intent of this act that the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services shall each operate their institutional programs and services within the department with autonomy and independence as intended by Arkansas Constitution, Amendment 33, the General Assembly recognizes that reasonable fiscal policies are necessary to assure that the various services of government are operated on a sound financial basis and that deficit spending is not implemented.

In furtherance of that policy, the General Assembly determines that:

The secretary, with respect to the allocation of funds and the exercise of fiscal restraint over all divisions, offices, sections, units, programs, services, and institutions within the department, shall have the ultimate authority to allocate and limit the amount of funds to be expended in the operation of each division, office, program, service, and institution within the department as he or she deems necessary to comply with the fiscal laws of this state; and

Nothing herein shall be construed to limit the ultimate authority of the secretary to develop and operate the various programs in the state institutional system.

However, all real property, including capital improvements thereon, constituting the Department of Human Services State Institutional System shall be under the control of the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board, and the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services may convey by sale or lease any real property within the state institutional system.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary” or “secretary” for “Director” or “director” throughout the section; and substituted “the Department of Human Services State Institutional System Board and the Board of Developmental Disabilities Services” for “that board” in (c)(3).

Meaning of “this act”. See note to §25-10-104.

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning reallocation of resources, was repealed by Acts 1999, No. 1537, § 83. The section was derived from Acts 1983, No. 307, § 5; 1985, No. 772, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-912.5; Acts 1987, No. 961, § 17; 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 68, § 16; 1997, No. 1360, § 81.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “clients with intellectual or other developmental disabilities” for “developmentally disabled clients” in (b).

Meaning of “this act”. See note to §25-10-104.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “Secretary of the Department of Human Services” for “Director of the Department of Human Services” in (a).

A.C.R.C. Notes. The operation of subsection (c) may be affected by the enactment of Acts 1995, No. 1211, codified as §25-16-901 et seq.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment by No. 315 substituted “rule” for “regulation” in (c).

The 2019 amendment by No. 910 substituted “Secretary” or “secretary” for “Director” or “director” in (a) and (b).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning the Community Services Advisory Council, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 764, §1. The section was derived from Acts 1981, No. 764, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-904.2.

History.

Acts 1975, No. 340, §§ 1, 2; A.S.A. 1947, §§ 5-912.2, 5-912.2n; Acts 2017, No. 913, § 122.

25-10-111. Budgeting generally.

(1)The Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall obtain from each division, office, section, or unit of the Department of Human Services, including the institutions and institutional boards thereunder, all requests for biennial appropriations and all requests for special supplemental or construction appropriations.

The secretary shall review the requests and submit to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the Governor, and the Legislative Council a coordinated budget for all divisions, offices, programs, institutions, and services of the department in whatever detail may be required by the state budgetary laws and by the budget forms and procedures promulgated by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State and by the Legislative Council.

It shall be the responsibility of the secretary to operate all of its divisions, offices, and programs and to require that each of the institutional boards under the department administer their programs within those fiscal limitations and restraints which the secretary deems necessary to assure that each program, service, and institution within the department receives an allocation of funds in accordance with the needs of the respective programs, services, and institutions and within the limitation of the moneys allocated and appropriated to the department for the operation of those programs, services, and institutions.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 348, § 11; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-912h; Acts 1997, No. 1333, § 1; 2019, No. 910, § 5248.

25-10-112. [Repealed.]

It is the intent and purpose of this act that no appropriation of funds provided by the General Assembly to the Department of Human Services for direct-care assistance to individuals or for the purchase of direct services for individuals shall be used in defraying state administrative or state case management costs of the department.

It is the specific intent of this act to prevent the diversion of community grant-in-aid line funds for any purpose that would not provide direct services to clients with intellectual or other developmental disabilities in community programs.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 348, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-912j; Acts 2019, No. 1035, § 54.

25-10-114. Developmental disabilities — Special authorization — Cash funds.

All funds received by the Division of Developmental Disabilities Services of the Department of Human Services shall be placed in the State Treasury and expended via appropriation.

Those funds held in trust by the agency for the residents of the human development centers, including gifts and bequests, shall be considered agency funds to be expended from bank accounts without legislative appropriation.

The Chief Fiscal Officer of the State shall have the final authority to determine those funds which may be exempted from being placed in the State Treasury unless otherwise provided by law. However, no agency funds deposited in bank accounts shall be expended for purposes other than those allowed for the expenditures of State Treasury funds under the provisions of the General Accounting and Budgetary Procedures Law, §19-4-101 et seq.

History.

Acts 1977, No. 787, § 10; 1995, No. 1198, § 70.

25-10-115. County offices of human services.

The Secretary of the Department of Human Services shall establish a county office of human services in each county of this state. The county offices shall provide the citizens of each county access to the various services and programs provided by the Department of Human Services as well as follow-up contact and services.

In establishing a county office of human services, it is necessary that each county office be staffed to provide complete access to services and programs of the department.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 348, § 13; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-912j; Acts 2019, No. 910, § 5249.

25-10-116. Advisory committees generally.

From time to time, the Secretary of the Department of Human Services or the Governor may establish various advisory committees to assist the secretary and the various divisions, offices, sections, or units within Department of Human Services in reviewing and offering advice on any of the programs, services, and duties of the department which the secretary or the Governor may deem appropriate for the proper and efficient operation of the department and its respective programs, services, and duties.

The advisory committees shall exist for the duration determined by the secretary or the Governor.

The members of the advisory committees shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary meals, lodging, and mileage for travel in accordance with the procedures and standards provided by law or rule for official travel by state employees in the performance of their duties. Payment shall be made from funds appropriated to the department.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 348, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 5-912b; Acts 2019, No. 315, § 2916; 2019, No. 910, § 5250.

25-10-117. [Repealed.]

The Office of Child Support Enforcement of the Revenue Division of the Department of Finance and Administration shall file a semiannual report with the Legislative Council concerning performance and progress made in administering the Child Support Enforcement Program approved under Title IV-D of the Social Security Act, 42 U.S.C. § 651 et seq.

History.

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 44, § 12; 1995, No. 1184, § 35.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Former §25-10-118, and identical §9-14-203 which had been renumbered as §25-10-118, concerning reporting requirements, are deemed to be superseded by this section. The former section was derived from Acts 1983, No. 926, § 40; 1985, No. 649, § 32; 1987, No. 921, § 15; A.S.A. 1947, § 34-2457.

25-10-119. Certification of vouchers.

The designated disbursing officers for the Department of Human Services are hereby authorized to complete and sign one (1) certification for each state voucher or other designated document that authorizes the Auditor of State or other official to draw a state warrant or check on a bond administered by the department.

The voucher or other authorizing document can consist of one (1) or more pages, and in the event that more than one (1) page is used, then the designated disbursing officer is to manually sign the last page only, and any certification is to be so worded that it will apply to all pages of the document.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Former §25-10-119 concerning the certification of vouchers, is deemed to be superseded by this section. The former section was derived from Acts 1987, No. 961, § 21.

Promote recruitment and retention of highly qualified professionals at programs operated or certified by the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services, community mental health center programs, and other public sector mental health programs in Arkansas;

Improve clinical care by exploring new, innovative, and scientifically based treatment models for adults with serious mental illness and children and adolescents with serious emotional disturbance;

Provide expanded clinical research and clinical-based research training opportunities for existing staff in institutional and community-based programs operated, certified, or supported by the division; and

Promote the understanding of the various interdisciplinary treatments and the challenges facing institutional and community-based mental health professionals in Arkansas.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary, the institute may enter into agreements with the division which may involve changes in staffing necessary to implement improved patient care programs contemplated by this section, and may enter into agreements with the Department of Psychiatry of the University of Arkansas for Medical Sciences to jointly operate or to support specific undertakings that are congruent with the institute's stated purposes.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “Behavioral” for “Mental” in (a)(1) and (b)(4).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services” for “Division of Behavioral Health Services” in (a)(1); and substituted “Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human Services” for “Division of Behavioral Health Services” in (b)(4).

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “Behavioral” for “Mental”in (a).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services” for “Division of Behavioral Health Services” in (a).

The 2019 amendment substituted “employed by the Secretary of the Department of Human Services” for “appointed by the Director of the Department of Human Services” in (b).

History.

Acts 1989 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 68, § 19.

25-10-120. Research and Training Institute.

The Research and Training Institute is authorized to seek, accept, and administer public or private funds, consisting of donations, federal and state grants, aids, contracts, reimbursements, cash donations, or state general revenue to accomplish its purposes. The institute is intended to:

To accomplish these purposes, the institute may enter into joint operating agreements with state universities or other institutions of higher education to:

Accomplish the placement and training of students and faculty in psychiatry, psychology, social work, occupational therapy, nursing, and other relevant professions;

Design, support, and implement clinical research projects to improve the quality and effectiveness of mental health services and operations;

Enter into agreements with community mental health centers and other public mental health providers to accomplish the exchange of professional staff between state-operated programs and community mental health centers; and

Establish a student loan program in accordance with procedures established by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, when the Director of the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services has determined a shortage of such professionals exists.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1082, § 21; 2013, No. 980, §§ 19, 20; 2017, No. 913, §§ 123, 124.

25-10-121. Proceeds from the sale of land — Deposit in special trust fund.

Pursuant to the process delineated in §22-6-601, in lieu of depositing the proceeds of the sale of lands in the fund from which the division or state agency is operated, a board of a state agency or a division within the Department of Human Services holding lands in its name may request, as a condition for sale of the lands, that the proceeds be deposited in a special trust fund to be created in the name of the board, state agency, or division on the books of the Treasurer of State, Auditor of State, and Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

Proceeds placed in the special trust fund shall be used solely for the maintenance and operation of the programs of the division, state agency, or board under whose name the lands were held.

If the division, state agency, or board requests the proceeds to be deposited in a special trust fund, the creation of the trust fund and the transfer of the proceeds to the trust fund shall be subject to approval by the Governor as a condition for approval of the sale.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1085, § 24.

25-10-122. Office of Minority Mental Health — Creation.

There is created an Office of Minority Mental Health within the Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services of the Department of Human Services.

The head of the Office of Minority Mental Health shall be employed by the Secretary of the Department of Human Services.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1210, § 1; 2013, No. 980, § 21; 2017, No. 913, § 125; 2019, No. 910, § 5251.

25-10-123. Programs and policies — Development.

The Office of Minority Mental Health shall develop programs and policies concerning the following:

Providing culturally relevant mental health services to minority individuals with mental illness;

Improving the availability and accessibility of mental health services to minority individuals with long-term mental illnesses;

Educating minority individuals with mental illness about their illness;

Providing minority families with education on mental illness; and

Providing accessible educational training within the mental health setting and the minority community.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted“Behavioral” for “Mental” in the introductory language.

The 2017 amendment substituted “Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services” for “Division of Behavioral Health Services” in the introductory language.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1210, § 2; 2013, No. 980, § 22; 2017, No. 913, § 126.

25-10-124. Administration of state or federal funds.

The Office of Minority Mental Health is the authorized state agency to accept, receive, retain, and administer any state or federal funds relating to minority mental health.

The office shall develop, comment on, and revise any designations of areas of minority mental health as underserved.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment substituted “Behavioral” for “Mental” in (a).

The 2017 amendment substituted “Division of Aging, Adult, and Behavioral Health Services” for “Division of Behavioral Health Services” in (a).

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning reimbursement of providers of targeted and independent case management services, and training and certification, was repealed by Acts 1992 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 1, § 6. The section was derived from Acts 1991, No. 922, § 18.

History.

Acts 1991, No. 1210, § 3; 2013, No. 980, § 23; 2017, No. 913, § 127.

25-10-125. [Repealed.]

Any private nonprofit community-based agency that receives grants-in-aid through the Department of Human Services for the provision of services, as a condition of receiving such funds, shall:

Meet minimum standards of performance in the delivery of services as defined by the department's division or office from which the grant-in-aid is awarded;

Supply statistical data to the department; and

Establish and maintain a sound financial management system in accordance with guidelines as set forth by the department.

A.C.R.C. Notes. Acts 2014, No. 295, § 14, provided:

“GRANTS IN AID — CONDITIONS FOR RECEIVING FUNDS. Private non-profit community-based programs licensed by the Department of Human Services, Developmental Disabilities Services, are eligible to receive funds appropriated for Grants to Community Providers in the Developmental Disabilities Services — Grants-in-Aid appropriation of this Act, and as a condition of receiving such funds they shall:

“1.Meet minimum standards of performance in the delivery of services to people with disabilities as defined by the Department of Human Services, Developmental Disabilities Services.

“2.Supply statistical and financial data to the Department of Human Services, Developmental Disabilities Services.

“3.Establish and maintain a sound financial management system in accordance with guidelines as set forth by the Department of Human Services.

“4.Establish and maintain community support programs designed to provide coordinated care and treatment to ensure ongoing involvement and individualized services for persons with disabilities. Every community support program shall provide services for persons with disabilities who reside within the respective area of the program.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2014 through June 30, 2015.”

Acts 2015, No. 979, § 13, provided:

“GRANTS IN AID — CONDITIONS FOR RECEIVING FUNDS. Private non-profit community-based programs licensed by the Department of Human Services, Developmental Disabilities Services, are eligible to receive funds appropriated for Grants to Community Providers in the Developmental Disabilities Services — Grants-in-Aid appropriation of this Act, and as a condition of receiving such funds they shall:

“1.Meet minimum standards of performance in the delivery of services to people with disabilities as defined by the Department of Human Services, Developmental Disabilities Services.

“2.Supply statistical and financial data to the Department of Human Services, Developmental Disabilities Services.

“3.Establish and maintain a sound financial management system in accordance with guidelines as set forth by the Department of Human Services.

“4.Establish and maintain community support programs designed to provide coordinated care and treatment to ensure ongoing involvement and individualized services for persons with disabilities. Every community support program shall provide services for persons with disabilities who reside within the respective area of the program.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2015 through June 30, 2016.”

Acts 2016, No. 91, § 13, provided:

“GRANTS IN AID — CONDITIONS FOR RECEIVING FUNDS. Private non-profit community-based programs licensed by the Department of Human Services, Developmental Disabilities Services, are eligible to receive funds appropriated for Grants to Community Providers in the Developmental Disabilities Services — Grants-in-Aid appropriation of this Act, and as a condition of receiving such funds they shall:

“1.Meet minimum standards of performance in the delivery of services to people with disabilities as defined by the Department of Human Services, Developmental Disabilities Services.

“2.Supply statistical and financial data to the Department of Human Services, Developmental Disabilities Services.

“3.Establish and maintain a sound financial management system in accordance with guidelines as set forth by the Department of Human Services.

“4.Establish and maintain community support programs designed to provide coordinated care and treatment to ensure ongoing involvement and individualized services for persons with disabilities. Every community support program shall provide services for persons with disabilities who reside within the respective area of the program.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2016 through June 30, 2017.”

Acts 2017, No. 835, §13, provided: “GRANTS IN AID — CONDITIONS FOR RECEIVING FUNDS.

Private non-profit community-based programs licensed by the Department of Human Services — Division of Developmental Disabilities Services, are eligible to receive funds appropriated for Grants to Community Providers in the Developmental Disabilities Services — Grants-in-Aid appropriation of this Act, and as a condition of receiving such funds they shall:

“1.Meet minimum standards of performance in the delivery of services to people with disabilities as defined by the Department of Human Services — Division of Developmental Disabilities Services.

“2.Supply statistical and financial data to the Department of Human Services — Division of Developmental Disabilities Services.

“3.Establish and maintain a sound financial management system in accordance with guidelines as set forth by the Department of Human Services.

“4.Establish and maintain community support programs designed to provide coordinated care and treatment to ensure ongoing involvement and individualized services for persons with disabilities. Every community support program shall provide services for persons with disabilities who reside within the respective area of the program.

“The provisions of this section shall be in effect only from July 1, 2017 through June 30, 2018.”

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1239, § 71.

25-10-127. Advance disbursements.

Advance disbursements of funds to providers made under payment methodologies are authorized when approved in advance by the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State.

History.

Acts 1993, No. 1239, § 72.

25-10-128. [Repealed.]

Publisher's Notes. This section, concerning Division of Community Service and Nonprofit Support, was repealed by Acts 2017, No. 913, §6. The section was derived from Acts 1993, No. 403, § 19; 1997, No. 1259, § 1; 2011, No. 42, § 1; 2015, No. 111, § 1.